Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1307.02
Legislature; salary survey; consideration.

The Legislature shall consider the results of the salary survey and any recommendation from the Governor, Director of Personnel, or Chief Negotiator concerning unorganized state employee salary increases when making appropriations to state agencies. The Legislature shall attempt to provide an appropriate balance between assuring that all employees performing at a satisfactory level will receive appropriate salary increases and the need for administrative flexibility to reward those who perform at a superior level.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 34.